Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task  Force on Community Safety and Firearm Suicide Prevention
is established.
(2) The task force consists of 17 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of  the Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives, one from the majority party  and one from the
minority party.
(c) The Governor  shall appoint 13 members, with consideration of geographic diversity,
as follows:
(A) A representative of a state public health agency;
(B) A public safety policy advisor to the Governor;
(C) A representative of a nonprofit organization focused on suicide prevention  with ex-
perience in lethal means safety;
(D) A representative of a community-based firearm safety and protocols program;
(E) A representative of the public health research field;
(F) A behavioral health professional or provider;
(G) An adult behavioral health provider;
(H) A medical provider who has worked with firearm violence victims;
(I) A psychologist who works with youth;
(J) A tribal representative from a suicide prevention program;
(K) A person with lived experience with community safety threats or suicidal ideation;
(L) A representative of law enforcement; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1503 (SB 1503-B) Page 1
(M) A professional who works in veterans’ mental health.
(3) The task force shall coordinate with the  Department of Justice, the Oregon Health
Authority, sheriff departments that provide  for voluntary storage of firearms, federally re-
cognized Indian tribes in this state, faith-based groups in this state and  the Oregon Alliance
to Prevent Suicide to study the following issues related  to public health best practices for
reducing deaths from community safety threats and for suicide prevention:
(a) How to better support youth experiencing suicidal ideation.
(b) How to better support rural Oregonians experiencing suicidal ideation.
(c) How to reduce stigma on suicidal ideation.
(d) Barriers to suicide prevention support.
(e) Current community safety protocol across this state, including  at hospitals and be-
havioral health facilities, and recommendations for improvement of the protocol.
(f) Locations and events most targeted in community safety threats.
(g) Rates of success for extreme risk protection orders and barriers  to implementation
and capacity for police stations or other  entities to implement voluntary surrender or hold-
ing of firearms.
(h) Barriers to implementing best practices for community  safety and suicide prevention.
(i) How domestic violence is a risk factor for community safety threats and suicide.
(j) Risks to first responders.
(4) The task force may engage a third party to research the issues  listed in subsection
(3) of this section.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit reports in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of  the Legislative As-
sembly related to health care no later than September 15, 2024, and September 15, 2025.
(12) The Department of Justice shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are  nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of  Justice, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended for the purpose of  paying a third party
for research ordered by the Task Force on  Community Safety and Firearm Suicide Pre-
vention, as authorized under section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1503 (SB 1503-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1503 (SB 1503-B) Page 3